Arkansas, session 2025, HB1899.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 20-81-101 is amended to read as follows:
20-81-101. Arkansas Veterans' Child Welfare Service.
(a)(1) There is established the Arkansas Veterans' Child Welfare
Service.
(2) The Arkansas Veterans’ Child Welfare Service shall be under
the direction of a director to be named by the Governor upon written
recommendation by the governing body of the American Legion — Department of
Arkansas Foundation, Inc.
(3) The Director of the Arkansas Veterans' Child Welfare Service
shall serve at the pleasure of the Governor.
(4) The director shall report to the Secretary of the Department
*LJH154*
03/31/2025 10:02:22 AM LJH154

HB1899
of Veterans Affairs.
(b)(1) The Arkansas Veterans’ Child Welfare Service shall establish a
program of furnishing temporary and interim welfare and rehabilitation
services and assistance for minor children of honorably discharged Arkansas
veterans who are deceased or medically incapacitated.
(2) The Arkansas Veterans’ Child Welfare Service is authorized
to enter into contracts and agreements with one (1) or more veterans'
organizations in this state, with private individuals or corporations, or
with the United States Government for the sharing of facilities or services
and for the administration of funds in furtherance of veterans' child welfare
services.
(c) Funds granted to the Arkansas Veterans’ Child Welfare Service,
other than state-appropriated funds, may be deposited into one (1) or more
bank accounts in banks in this state and shall be administered in accordance
with purposes for which the funds were granted as authorized in this section.





















03/31/2025 10:02:22 AM LJH154